North Carolina, session 2025, SB909.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Building
Understanding of Movement in Pregnancy Act" or "The BUMP Act."

PART II. STILLBIRTH PREVENTION EDUCATIONAL INFORMATION AND
TRAINING
SECTION 2.1. Article 5 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 130A-128.10. Department to provide free educational information and training on
stillbirth prevention.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Evidence-based stillbirth prevention education. – Education grounded in
current clinical guidance and peer-reviewed evidence regarding modifiable
stillbirth risk factors, including, but not limited to, fetal movement education,
infection screening, hypertensive disorders, diabetes, smoking and substance
exposure, placental insufficiency, and umbilical cord complications.
(2) Fetal movement education. – Standardized counseling beginning no later than
28 weeks of gestation on the importance of monitoring fetal movement and
the steps to take if movement decreases or changes, including same-day
clinical evaluation.
(3) High-disparity area. – Any county, region, or zip code identified by the
Department as having stillbirth rates above the statewide average, including
disproportionate impact on minority populations and other underrepresented
groups.
(4) Stillbirth or fetal death. – The death of a fetus at or after 20 weeks of gestation,
excluding an induced termination of pregnancy.
(b) Educational Materials for Pregnant Patients. – The Department shall provide all
pregnant patients in North Carolina with standardized, evidence-based educational materials on
*S909-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
stillbirth prevention and urgent maternal and fetal warning signs during prenatal care. The
Department shall provide these educational materials statewide in English and Spanish, plus
other languages as community needs require. At a minimum, these educational materials shall
include all of the following:
(1) Guidance on fetal movement education and when to seek urgent evaluation
for decreased fetal movement.
(2) Information on maternal warning signs that require immediate care, including,
but not limited to, severe headache, vision changes, chest pain, shortness of
breath, heavy bleeding, fever, and severe abdominal pain.
(3) Information on stillbirth risk factors and prevention strategies, including the
role of infections, hypertension, diabetes, sleep position, smoking, and
substance exposure.
(4) Clear instructions for how to contact the prenatal care team after hours and
how to access urgent evaluation.
(5) Materials in English and Spanish statewide, with additional languages as
needed based on community need.
The Department may satisfy this requirement through contracts or partnerships with qualified
organizations, including community-based organizations, with demonstrated expertise in
conducting statewide stillbirth prevention education and multilingual outreach.
(c) Required Provider Training. – The Department shall develop or procure
evidence-based training for prenatal care providers on stillbirth prevention protocols. The
training shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(1) Standardized fetal movement education and documentation requirements
beginning no later than 28 weeks.
(2) Clinical response protocols for decreased fetal movement, including same-day
assessment and escalation pathways.
(3) Recognition and management of infection-related stillbirth risks, including
screening and treatment guidance for syphilis and other infections consistent
with clinical standards.
(4) Recognition of placental and umbilical cord-related risk factors and when to
increase surveillance in the third trimester.
The Department shall make this training available in both virtual and in-person formats and
may satisfy this requirement through contracts or partnerships with qualified organizations
capable of conducting statewide training that meets the requirements of this section."
SECTION 2.2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of four hundred thousand dollars
($400,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated and used as
follows:
(1) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to provide evidence-based
educational materials on stillbirth prevention and urgent maternal and fetal
warning signs to pregnant patients during prenatal care, as required by
G.S. 130A-128.10(b), as enacted by Section 2.1 of this act.
(2) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to develop or procure
evidence-based training for prenatal care providers on stillbirth prevention
protocols, as required by G.S. 130A-128.10(c), as enacted by Section 2.1 of
this act.

PART III. COUNT THE KICKS PROGRAM
SECTION 3.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to launch a statewide
Page 2 Senate Bill 909-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"Count the Kicks" stillbirth prevention public awareness campaign. The purpose of this public
awareness campaign is to educate expectant parents, healthcare and social services providers,
and community-based organizations focused on caring for pregnant women about the importance
of tracking fetal movement during the third trimester of pregnancy. In conducting this public
awareness campaign, the Department shall prioritize outreach in high-disparity areas. In addition
to covering the costs of establishing and operating the program, these funds shall be used to do
all of the following:
(1) Provide training to healthcare providers, including obstetricians, obstetrical
nurses, visiting nurses, childbirth educators, doulas, and midwives; providers
of social services; and community-based organizations focused on caring for
pregnant women.
(2) Develop educational materials in both English and Spanish for expectant
parents on the importance of tracking fetal movements for stillbirth
prevention.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 909-First Edition Page 3